es: Mecanismo de pared lateral: Pared abatible; Lateral fijo; Pared plegable; Panel lateral extraíble; Pared corrediza; Pared con cremallera; Otro
lt-LT: Šoninės sienelės mechanizmas: Nuleidžiama siena; Fiksuotas šonas; Atlenkiama siena; Nuimamas šoninis skydas; Stumdoma siena; Užtrauktuku atsegama siena; Kita
th: กลไกผนังด้านข้าง: ผนังแบบเลื่อนลง; ด้านข้างแบบยึดติดตาย; ผนังแบบพับลง; แผงด้านข้างแบบถอดได้; ผนังบานเลื่อน; ผนังแบบรูดซิป; อื่นๆ
sv: Sidoväggsmekanism: Nedfällbar vägg; Fast sida; Fällbar vägg; Avtagbar sidopanel; Skjutvägg; Vägg med dragkedja; Övrigt
en: Side wall mechanism: Drop-down wall; Fixed side; Fold-down wall; Removable side panel; Sliding wall; Zip-down wall; Other
pt-PT: Mecanismo da parede lateral: Parede rebatível; Lateral fixa; Parede dobrável; Painel lateral amovível; Parede deslizante; Parede com fecho; Outro
tr: Yan duvar mekanizması: Açılır duvar; Sabit yan; Katlanır duvar; Çıkarılabilir yan panel; Sürgülü duvar; Fermuarlı duvar; Diğer
hr-HR: Mehanizam bočnog zida: Spuštajuća stijenka; Fiksna bočna stijenka; Preklopna stijenka; Uklonjiva bočna ploča; Klizna stijenka; Zid na patentni zatvarač; Ostalo
ro-RO: Mecanism al peretelui lateral: Perete care se lasă în jos; Laterală fixă; Perete rabatabil în jos; Panou lateral detașabil; Perete culisant; Perete cu fermoar; Altul
nl: Zijwandmechanisme: Verzinkbare wand; Vaste zijkant; Neerklapbare wand; Verwijderbaar zijpaneel; Schuifwand; Afritsbare wand; Overig
fi: Reunan mekanismi: Alaslaskettava seinä; Kiinteä sivu; Taittoseinä; Irrotettava sivupaneeli; Liukuseinä; Vetoketjulla avattava seinä; Muu
hu: Oldalfal-mechanizmus: Lehajtható fal; Fix oldal; Összecsukható fal; Levehető oldalpanel; Tolófal; Lecipzározható fal; Egyéb
sl-SI: Mehanizem stranice: Spustna stena; Fiksna stranica; Preklopna stena; Odstranljiva stranska plošča; Drsna stena; Stena na zadrgo; Drugo
de: Seitenwandmechanismus: Absenkbare Wand; Feste Seite; Klappwand; Abnehmbare Seitenwand; Schiebewand; Wand mit Reißverschluss; Andere
nb: Sideveggmekanisme: Nedfellbar vegg; Fast side; Nedbrettbar vegg; Avtakbart sidepanel; Skyvevegg; Vegg med glidelås; Annet
bg-BG: Механизъм за странична стена: Падаща стена; Фиксирана страна; Сгъваема стена; Подвижен страничен панел; Плъзгаща се стена; Стена с цип; Друг
fr: Mécanisme de la paroi latérale: Paroi abaissable; Côté fixe; Paroi rabattable; Panneau latéral amovible; Paroi coulissante; Paroi zippée; Autre
zh-TW: 側欄機制: 下放式側牆; 固定式側牆; 摺疊式側牆; 可拆卸式側板; 滑動式側牆; 拉鍊式側牆; 其他
ko: 측벽 작동 방식: 드롭다운 벽; 고정된 측면; 접이식 벽; 탈착식 측면 패널; 슬라이딩 벽; 지퍼식 벽; 기타
ja: 側壁メカニズム: ドロップダウンウォール; 固定サイド; フォールドダウンウォール; 取り外し可能サイドパネル; スライディングウォール; ジップダウンウォール; その他
it: Meccanismo della sponda laterale: Parete a caduta; Lato fisso; Parete ribaltabile; Pannello laterale rimovibile; Parete scorrevole; Parete con zip; Altro
zh-CN: 侧边护栏机制: 下拉式侧壁; 固定侧面; 折叠式侧壁; 可拆卸侧板; 滑动式侧壁; 拉链式侧壁; 其他
el: Μηχανισμός πλευρικού τοιχώματος: Τοίχωμα καθόδου; Σταθερή πλευρά; Αναδιπλούμενο τοίχωμα; Αφαιρούμενο πλευρικό πάνελ; Συρόμενο τοίχωμα; Τοίχωμα με φερμουάρ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Mechanizmus bočnej steny: Spúšťacia stena; Pevná bočnica; Sklápacia stena; Odnímateľný bočný panel; Posuvná stena; Stena na zips; Iné
cs: Mechanismus boční stěny: Spouštěcí stěna; Pevná stěna; Sklopná stěna; Odnímatelný boční panel; Posuvná stěna; Stěna na zip; Jiný
vi: Cơ cấu thành bên: Vách thả xuống; Mặt bên cố định; Vách gập xuống; Tấm ốp hông có thể tháo rời; Vách trượt; Vách có khóa kéo; Khác
ru: Механизм боковой стенки: Опускающаяся стенка; Фиксированная стенка; Откидная стенка; Съемная боковая панель; Раздвижная стенка; Стенка на молнии; Другое
pt-BR: Parede lateral mecanismo: Parede rebatível; Lado fixo; Parede dobrável; Painel lateral removível; Parede deslizante; Parede com zíper; Outro
pl: Mechanizm ścianki bocznej: Ściana opuszczana; Ściana stała; Ściana składana; Zdejmowany panel boczny; Ściana przesuwna; Ściana na zamek błyskawiczny; Inne
da: Sidevægsmekanisme: Nedfældbar væg; Fast side; Foldbar væg; Aftageligt sidepanel; Skydevæg; Væg med lynlås; Andet